District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.13

Definitions.

The term “teacher,” under this subchapter, shall include all teachers permanently employed by the Board of Education in the public day schools of the District of Columbia, including other educational employees whose salaries are established in the Act approved June 20, 1906, and acts amendatory thereof, except the employees of the Recreation Board and the Department of School Attendance and Work Permits; the term “annual salary” shall be construed to mean the total annual income received during the fiscal year for services rendered in the public day schools of the District of Columbia, including basic salary, longevity allowance, session room allowance, and increase of compensation (bonus); and whenever the pronoun “his” occurs in this subchapter it shall be construed to mean both male and female teachers.

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 13
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 730, ch. 556, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1214.
1973 Ed., § 31-714.
The “Act approved June 20, 1906,” referred to near the beginning of the section, refers to the Act of June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 316, ch. 3446.